Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2197.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1327.2 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1327.2. Attendance Policy at Charter, Regional Charter and Cyber Charter Schools.--* * *(d) A board of trustees of a charter, regional charter or cyber charter school shall report to the department each fiscal year the number of students who returned to the school district of residence or were otherwise removed from the charter, regional charter or cyber charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617181920